Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 25 County (Probate), Quarterly and Justices’ Courts [Repealed]

25.010.
Criminal and penal jurisdiction of county, quarterly and justices’ courts. [Repealed.]

25.012.
Jurisdiction of county judge or justice of peace to examine criminal charge — Homicide. [Repealed.]

25.014.
Jury trial in criminal prosecutions in county, quarterly and justices’ courts. [Repealed.]

25.015.
Process, to whom directed — Special agent — Who may execute. [Repealed.]

25.020.
Judge or justice to have powers and duties as clerks. [Repealed.]

25.025.
Quarterly court clerk — County clerk’s duties. [Repealed.]

25.030.
District in which trial to be held — More than one defendant — Transient defendant. [Repealed.]

25.035.
Jury trial, when may be claimed — Qualifications of jurors. [Repealed.]

25.037.
Jury commissioners for inferior courts — Appointment — Qualifications — Procedures — Compensation — Expenses. [Repealed.]

25.038.
Trial commissioners for inferior courts in county containing an urban-county government. [Repealed.]

25.040.
Docket — Records and indexes to be kept. [Repealed.]

25.045.
New judgment if record lost or destroyed. [Repealed.]

25.050.
Setoff or counterclaim in excess of court’s jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

25.055.
Trial of provisional remedy. [Repealed.]

25.060.
Exemption of land from levy under execution. [Repealed.]

25.065.
Procedure for sale of land when return of execution shows “no property found.” [Repealed.]

25.070.
Appeals, docketing and procedure for trial. [Repealed.]

25.110.
Civil jurisdiction of county court. [Repealed.]

25.120.
Terms of county court — Where held. [Repealed.]

25.130.
County judge, bond of. [Repealed.]

25.140.
County judge pro tem — Special judge. [Repealed.]

25.150.
County judge, powers of. [Repealed.]

25.160.
Record of orders and judgments — Who may sign. [Repealed.]

25.170.
Settlement with fiduciaries — Special commissioner. [Repealed.]

25.172.
When informal settlement may be accepted from fiduciary. [Repealed.]

25.175.
Periodic accounting by fiduciaries — Final settlement. [Repealed.]

25.180.
Evidence — How produced — Allowances to be supported by facts. [Repealed.]

25.190.
Report and filing of settlement. [Repealed.]

25.195.
Notice of filing settlement. [Repealed.]

25.200.
Exceptions — Confirmation — Recording — Effect as evidence. [Repealed.]

25.205.
Certification of list of fiduciaries delinquent in accounting — Notice — Fee. [Repealed.]

25.210.
Sureties of fiduciaries, inquiry into solvency of — Additional surety. [Repealed.]

25.215.
Settlement of accounts of fiduciaries — Jurisdiction. [Repealed.]

25.220.
County judge or county clerk may not be fiduciary. [Repealed.]

25.225.
Practice of law by county judge. [Repealed.]

25.230.
Compensation of special commissioner in counties having city of second class. [Repealed.]

25.240.
Office of county judge — Filing and preservation of papers. [Repealed.]

25.250.
Salary of county judge. [Repealed.]

25.260.
Compensation of county judge for serving in misdemeanor case. [Repealed.]

25.270.
Vacation of county judge — Salary of pro tem judge. [Repealed.]

25.280.
Trial commissioner for county court. [Repealed.]

25.290.
Stenographer to county judge. [Repealed.]

25.300.
Duties of stenographer — May administer oath. [Repealed.]

25.310.
Salary of stenographer. [Repealed.]

25.320.
County judge expense allowance fund. [Repealed.]

25.330.
Payments to judges from fund. [Repealed.]

25.350.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

25.360.
County judge pro tem to assume duties. [Repealed.]

25.370.
Appointment of county judge pro tem. [Repealed.]

25.380.
Succession of fiscal court member. [Repealed.]

25.390.
Duration of successor’s service. [Repealed.]

25.410.
Civil jurisdiction of quarterly courts. [Repealed.]

25.420.
Real property cases, transfer of to circuit court. [Repealed.]

25.430.
Motions against constables and their sureties. [Repealed.]

25.440.
Appeals from justices’, police and fiscal courts. [Repealed.]

25.450.
County judge to preside — Pro tem judge — Terms of court — Where held in certain counties. [Repealed.]

25.460.
Special judge of quarterly court. [Repealed.]

25.470.
Records of quarterly courts. [Repealed.]

25.480.
Clerk, quarterly court — Appointment — Powers — Duties — Salary. [Repealed.]

25.490.
Clerks and deputy clerks in quarterly courts in counties having an urban-county government and in counties of 250,000 population — Salaries — Duties — Bonds — Disposition of fees. [Repealed.]

25.500.
Fee for commencing civil action in quarterly court in counties of 250,000 population. [Repealed.]

25.510.
Bonds for appearance of persons arrested — Clerk or deputy to take — Office to be open at night. [Repealed.]

25.610.
Civil jurisdiction of justices’ courts. [Repealed.]

25.620.
Terms of justice’s court — How fixed. [Repealed.]

25.625.
Fiscal court may allow justice to hold court in courthouse in county with second or third-class city — County to provide office and equipment. [Repealed.]

25.630.
Absence or disability of justice — Vacancy — Successor of justice. [Repealed.]

25.640.
Powers of justice. [Repealed.]

25.650.
Bond of justice. [Repealed.]

25.660.
Record books — Receipts for payment of fines and forfeitures. [Repealed.]

25.670.
Warrants and motions, order of trial. [Repealed.]

25.680.
Reappportionment of county into justices’ districts. [Repealed.]

25.690.
Commissioners to reapportion county. [Repealed.]

25.700.
Establishment of boundaries — Election precinct line not to be crossed — Exceptions to report. [Repealed.]

25.710.
Recorder and deputy recorder in counties of 250,000 population. [Repealed.]

25.720.
Duties and powers of recorder. [Repealed.]

25.730.
Liability of recorder and sureties. [Repealed.]

25.740.
Office of justice, constables and recorders — Expense of. [Repealed.]

25.750.
Uniform rules of court — Adoption and amendment by justices. [Repealed.]

25.760.
Blank warrants. [Repealed.]

25.770.
False entries on books of justice or recorder. [Repealed.]

25.780.
Justice’s clerks in county containing second-class city. [Repealed.]

25.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]